Hawaii statutes.
C.
Registration

Case Notes

The "noncandidate committee" definition and
accompanying reporting and disclosure requirements were substantially related
to Hawaii's important interests in informing the electorate, preventing
corruption or its appearance, and avoiding the circumvention of valid campaign
finance laws. Because the burden of complying with the disclosure scheme was
modest compared to the significance of the interests being served, the court
upheld the noncandidate committee reporting and disclosure requirements, as
applied to plaintiff, a for-profit corporation. 786 F.3d 1182 (2015).

[§11-321] Registration of
candidate committee or noncandidate committee. (a) Each candidate
committee or noncandidate committee shall register with the commission by
filing an organizational report as set forth in section 11-322 or 11-323, as
applicable.

(b) Before filing the organizational report,
each candidate committee or noncandidate committee shall mail or deliver an
electronic filing form to the commission.

(c) The electronic filing form shall include a
written acceptance of appointment and certification of each report, as follows:

(1) A candidate committee shall file a written
acceptance of appointment by the chairperson and treasurer and a certification
by the candidate and treasurer of each filed report; or

(2) A noncandidate committee shall file a written
acceptance of appointment by the chairperson and treasurer and a certification
by the chairperson and treasurer of each filed report.

(d) The organizational report for a candidate
committee shall be filed within ten days of the earlier of:

(1) The date the candidate files nomination papers
for office; or

(2) The date the candidate or candidate committee
receives contributions or makes or incurs expenditures of more than $100 in the
aggregate during the applicable election period.

(e) An organizational report need not be filed
under this section by an elected official who is a candidate for reelection to
the same office in successive elections and has not sought election to any
other office during the period between elections, unless the candidate is
required to report a change in information pursuant to section 11-323.

(f) A candidate shall have only one candidate
committee.

(g) The organizational report for a
noncandidate committee shall be filed within ten days of receiving
contributions or making or incurring expenditures of more than $1,000, in the
aggregate, in a two-year election period; provided that within the thirty-day
period prior to an election, a noncandidate committee shall register by filing
an organizational report within two days of receiving contributions or making
or incurring expenditures of more than $1,000, in the aggregate, in a two-year
election period. [L 2010, c 211, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next